Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-594
Exercise of jurisdiction; ratified.

The exercise of any jurisdiction, prior to, on, or after July 1, 1985, authorized by law and any action taken pursuant to such exercise are hereby ratified and shall not be subject to attack for the sole reason that they were not authorized at the time.

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 11.